Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

James K. Polk Home

4-13-201. Property conveyed to association.

There is hereby conveyed in trust to the James K. Polk Memorial Association, a corporation organized under the laws of Tennessee, for the general welfare and not for profit, and its successors in trust, a tract of land in the second ward of the city of Columbia, located on the corner of West Seventh Street and South High Street, known as the James K. Polk Home, being the same land conveyed to the state by George L. Reynolds and Bessie F. Reynolds, his wife, by deed dated January 8, 1929, recorded in the registrar's office of Maury County, Tennessee, book 177, page 71.

Acts 1929, ch. 110, § 1.

The James K. Polk memorial association, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Cross-References. Polk grave site, Jackson statue, §4-11-209.

4-13-202. Purposes of conveyance in trust.

This conveyance in trust is made so that the James K. Polk Memorial Association shall restore and preserve the property herein conveyed as a permanent memorial to James K. Polk, governor of Tennessee and eleventh president of the United States, and as a shrine of American patriotism.

Acts 1929, ch. 110, § 2.

4-13-203. Annual report to governor.

The James K. Polk Memorial Association shall make an annual report to the governor of its performance of the duties herein imposed, and of its compliance with the terms of the uses and trusts herein created.

Acts 1929, ch. 110, § 3.

4-13-204. Revocability of trust.

In the event the James K. Polk Memorial Association or its successors in trust shall fail to execute the provisions of this trust, the trust shall be terminable by the general assembly.

Acts 1929, ch. 110, § 4.